Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6905
Court proceedings;
no fees or costs required.

No filing fees or costs
shall be required of any pregnant woman at either the trial or appellate level
for any proceedings pursuant to sections 71-6901 to 71-6911.

Laws 1991, LB 425, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB690, § 9.